Oklahoma, session 2025, HB1139.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1280.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1280.1.
POSSESSION OF FIREARM ON SCHOOL PROPERTY
A. It shall be unlawful for any person to have in his or her
possession on any public or private school property or while in any
school bus or vehicle used by any school for transportation of
students or teachers any firearm or weapon designated in Section
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1139 SFLR Page 1
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1272 of this title, except as provided in subsection C of this
section or as otherwise authorized by law.
B. For purposes of this section:
1. "School property" means any publicly owned property held for
purposes of elementary, secondary or vocational-technical education,
and shall not include property owned by public school districts or
where such property is leased or rented to an individual or
corporation and used for purposes other than educational;
2. "Private school" means a school that offers a course of
instruction for students in one or more grades from prekindergarten
through grade twelve and is not operated by a governmental entity;
and
3. "Motor vehicle" means any automobile, truck, minivan or
sports utility vehicle.
C. Firearms and weapons are allowed on school property and
deemed not in violation of subsection A of this section as follows:
1. A gun or knife designed for hunting or fishing purposes kept
in a privately owned vehicle and properly displayed or stored as
required by law, provided such vehicle containing said gun or knife
is driven onto school property only to transport a student to and
from school and such vehicle does not remain unattended on school
property;
2. A gun firearm or knife used for the purposes of
participating in the Oklahoma Department of Wildlife Conservation
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1139 SFLR Page 2
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

cert ified hunter training education course or any other hunting,
fishing, safety or firearms training courses, or a recognized
firearms sports event, team shooting program or competition, or
living history reenactment, provided the course or event is approved
by the principal or chief administrator of the school where the
course or event is offered, and provided the weapon firearm or knife
is properly displayed or stored as required by law pending
participation in the course, event, program or competition;
3. 2. Weapons Firearms or weapons in the possession of any
peace officer or other person authorized by law to possess a weapon
firearms or weapons in the performance of his or her duties and
responsibilities;
4. 3. A concealed or unconcealed firearm or weapon carried onto
private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any
private school for transportation of students or teachers by a
person who is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,
provided a policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the
private school that authorizes the possession of a firearm or weapon
on private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by a
private school. Except for acts of gross negligence or willful or
wanton misconduct, a governing entity of a private school that
adopts a policy which authorizes the possession of a firearm or
weapon on private school property, a school bus or vehicle used by
the private school shall be immune from and not subject to liability
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1139 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

for any injuries arising from the adoption of the policy. The
provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to claims pursuant to
the Workers' Compensation Code;
5. 4. A gun firearm, knife, bayonet or other weapon in the
possession of a member of a veterans group, the national guard
National Guard, active military, the Reserve Officers' Training
Corps (ROTC) or Junior ROTC, in order to participate in a ceremony,
assembly or educational program approved by the principal or chief
administrator of a school or school district where the ceremony,
assembly or educational program is being held; provided, however,
the gun firearm or other weapon that uses projectiles is not loaded
and is inoperable at all times while on school property;
6. 5. A handgun firearm carried in a privately owned motor
vehicle pursuant to a valid handgun license authorized by the
provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act onto property set aside
by a public or private elementary or secondary school for the use or
parking of any vehicle; provided, however, said handgun the firearm
shall be stored and hidden from view in a locked motor vehicle when
the motor vehicle is left unattended on school property; and
7. 6. A handgun carried onto public school property by school
personnel who have been designated by the board of education,
provided such personnel either:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1139 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. possess a valid armed security guard license as
provided for in Section 1750.1 et seq. of Title 59 of
the Oklahoma Statutes, or
b. hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as
provided for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the
Oklahoma Statutes,
if a policy has been adopted by the board of education of the school
district that authorizes the carrying of a handgun onto public
school property by such personnel. Nothing in this subsection shall
be construed to restrict authority granted elsewhere in law to carry
firearms.
D. Any person violating the provisions of this section shall,
upon conviction, be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of
not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00).
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON PUBLIC SAFETY
April 15, 2025 - DO PASS








SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB1139 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)